src/fst/morphology/phonology.twolc
!"Disallow t:d following non-voiced ^TD"
!! **@RULENAME@**
!%^TD
!%^TD:0 /<=
! [SurfVows |CnsVoiceless:] (ь:) %>  _ %> т: ;
!вечкемс+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1+OcSg2: **love/rakastaa**
!!$ вечк>^TD>т{АЯ}н
!!$ вечк>0>дян

"Disallow k for control of comparative with stem types"
!! **@RULENAME@**
к:к /<=
 [н|й] (ь:) (HarmDummies:) %> %{оеэØ%}: ш _ а: ; ! comparative
 [ж|ш|ч|з|с] (ь:) (HarmDummies:) %> ш _ а: ; ! comparative
 [л] (ь:) (HarmDummies:) %> %{оеэØ%}: _ с ; ! translative
 [к|г|п|б|т|д|ж|ш|с|з|ч] (ь:) (HarmDummies:) %> _ с ; ! translative
! [к|г|п|б|т|д|ж|ш|с|з|ч|в] (ь:) (HarmDummies:) %> _ с ; ! translative
 
!!TESTS
!echo 'п а н ж > с ы' | hfst-pair-test src/fst/phonology.compose.hfst
!echo 'панжомс+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcSg3' | hfst-lookup src/fst/lexicon.hfst

!echo 'м е р ь:0 > с ь' | hfst-pair-test src/fst/phonology.compose.hfst
!echo 'меремс+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3' | hfst-lookup src/fst/lexicon.hfst
